Utah statutes.
78A-2-402.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Certified court reporter" has the same meaning as in Title 58, Chapter 74, Certified Court Reporters Licensing Act.

(2)  "Folio" means 100 words.  A number expressed as a numeral counts as one word; however, any portion of the last folio is not counted.

(3)  "Official court transcriber" means a person certified in accordance with rules of the Judicial Council as competent to transcribe into written form an audio or video recording of court proceedings.

